Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PRIVATE SALE OF TAX-FORFEITED LAND; AITKIN COUNTY.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding the public sale provisions of Minnesota Statutes, chapter 282, or other law to the contrary, Aitkin County may sell by private sale the tax-forfeited lands described in paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (b) The conveyance must be in a form approved by the attorney general. The attorney general may make changes to the land description to correct errors and ensure accuracy. new text end new text begin (c) The land to be sold is located in Aitkin County and is described as: the East 32 feet of the West 250 feet of Lot 5 and the East 32 feet of the West 250 feet of the North 10 feet of Lot 3, Hill City Realty Cos Fourth Addition, Section 14, Township 52 North, Range 26 West, Aitkin County, Minnesota (0.1 acres) (parcel number 57-1-073003). new text end new text begin (d) The county has determined that the county's land management interests would best be served if the lands were returned to private ownership. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end